Wyoming statutes. Title 38 Sureties
Chapter 2 Surety Bonds

Cross references. —

As to bonds of state officers and employees, see §

9-1-102

.

As to bonds of officers of cities and towns, see §§

15-3-207

,

15-7-405

,

15-7-410

.

As to bonds of officers of counties, see §§

18-1-311

,

18-3-102

,

18-3-111

,

18-3-112

,

18-9-202

.

As to bonds of commissioners of irrigation districts, see §§

41-7-302

,

41-7-304

.

As to bonds of treasurers of public irrigation and power districts, see §

41-7-806

.

As to bonds of commissioners of drainage districts, see §§

41-9-117

,

41-9-125

,

41-9-204

.

As to bonds of directors of water and sewer districts, see §

41-10-109

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d Bonds § 21; 74 Am. Jur. 2d Suretyship § 7 et seq.

Liability of public officer or his bond for defaults and misfeasance of his clerks, assistants or deputies, 71 ALR2d 1140.

11 C.J.S. Bonds § 1 et seq.; 72 C.J.S. Principal and Surety § 1 et seq.

§ 38-2-101.
Bonds of officers having custody of money; of whom required; conditions.

The state treasurer and the treasurer of each county, city, town, school district, irrigation district, drainage district, and any other public officer having the custody of moneys, shall be required to furnish a bond in the amount required by law, which bond shall be conditioned that he shall faithfully perform all of the duties of his office as prescribed by law, and that he will safely keep all moneys which may come into his hands by virtue of his office, that he will promptly pay over to the person or persons legally authorized to receive the same all such moneys in the manner provided by law, and that he will deliver over to his successor in office all moneys held by him as such officer. Each of the said officers, and his bondsmen and sureties, respectively, shall be responsible for the safekeeping and paying over according to law of all funds which shall come into his hands by virtue of his office.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 94, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2616; C.S. 1910, § 281; C.S. 1920, § 321; Laws 1931, ch. 98, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 14-101; C.S. 1945, § 68-101; W.S. 1957, § 38-10.

Construction. —

Bond of county treasurer to use all reasonable skill and diligence safely to keep funds coming into her hands must be construed in connection with depository act in determining her liability for loss of school funds by failure of bank not designated as depository. Reed v. People, 34 Wyo. 189, 242 P. 319,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1926).

§ 38-2-102.
Sureties and bondsmen on official bonds.

The sureties and bondsmen on such official bonds shall be residents of the state of Wyoming, who shall duly qualify to own property in the state amounting in the aggregate to double the amount of the bond upon which they become sureties. Provided, however, that any surety or guaranty company, duly qualified to act as surety or guarantor in this state upon executing such bonds, shall be accepted in lieu of such sureties.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 94, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2617; C.S. 1910, § 282; C.S. 1920, § 322; R.S. 1931, § 14-102; C.S. 1945, § 68-102; W.S. 1957, § 38-11.

Cross references. —

As to surety companies generally, see §§

38-3-101

to

38-3-104

.

As to bond with unauthorized surety company being void, see §

38-3-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability on officer’s bond for theft of public money by clerk, assistant or deputy, 71 ALR2d 1140.

§ 38-2-103.
Payment of premium when bond of state, etc., treasurer furnished by surety company.

When the bond of the state treasurer or of the treasurer of any county, city, town, or school district in this state shall be furnished by a guaranty or surety company, the premium due such company for furnishing such bond shall be paid out of the public funds of said state, county, city, town, or school district, respectively; and the premium due on the bond of the state treasurer shall be paid out of the contingent fund in his office.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 94, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2618; C.S. 1910, § 283; C.S. 1920, § 323; Laws 1921, ch. 39, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 14-103; C.S. 1945, § 68-103; W.S. 1957, § 38-12.

§ 38-2-104.
Form of condition of obligation.

All bonds required by the three (3) preceding sections [§§

38-2-101

to

38-2-103

] may be conditioned as follows:

“Whereas, the above bounden
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
was
. . . . .
to the office of
. . . . .
on the
. . . . .
day of
. . . . .
A.D.,
. . . . .

Now, therefore, the conditions of this obligation are such that if the said bounden
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
and his deputies shall well and truly perform all the duties of his said office of
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
as is or may be prescribed by law and shall with all reasonable skill, diligence, good faith and honesty safely keep and be responsible for all funds coming into the hands of such officer by virtue of his office; and pay over without delay to the person or persons authorized by law to receive the same all moneys which may come into his hands by virtue of his said office; and shall well and truly deliver to his successor in office, or such other person or persons as are authorized by law to receive the same, all moneys, books, papers and things of every kind and nature held by him as such officer, the above obligation to be void; otherwise remain in full force and effect.”

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 94, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2619; C.S. 1910, § 284; C.S. 1920, § 324; R.S. 1931, § 14-104; C.S. 1945, § 68-104; W.S. 1957, § 38-13.

Cross references. —

As to rights and remedies of sureties, see §§

38-1-101

to

38-1-109

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 5, ch. 94, Laws 1899, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Liability on bank failure. —

County treasurer and surety are liable on official bond for loss of school funds by failure of bank not designated as depository. Reed v. People, 34 Wyo. 189, 242 P. 319,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1926).

§ 38-2-105.
Bonds of state, county and municipal officers; payment of premiums.

Any state, county, municipal or district officer required by law or the order of any state, county or municipal council, board or organization to give a bond or other obligation, may include as a part of the lawful expenses of executing and performing the duties of his office, a reasonable sum paid a company authorized under the laws of this state to become his surety on the bond or obligation. He may pay the sum or expense from any contingent or other fund furnished by the state, county, municipality or organization for the payment of the lawful expenses of the officer or may upon proper presentation of a claim for the sum or expense, have it paid by any state, county or municipal council, board or organization that ordered and directed the bond or obligation to be furnished.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 9, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2622; C.S. 1910, § 287; C.S. 1920, § 327; R.S. 1931, § 14-107; C.S. 1945, § 68-107; W.S. 1957, § 38-14; Laws 1983, ch. 77, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability on bond of police or other peace officer for deformation, 13 ALR2d 897.

Personal liability on bond of policeman, sheriff or other peace officer, for negligently causing personal injury or death, 60 ALR2d 873.

§ 38-2-106.
Bonds of state, county and municipal officers; release of sureties.

Any surety upon the bond of any state, county or municipal officer shall be released from further liability of such surety for such officer, by filing with the person or persons having authority to approve said bond, or with whom said bond is directed to be filed, a notice that said surety is unwilling longer to be security for such state, county or municipal officer. When any notice shall be filed as aforesaid, notice thereof shall immediately be given to such state, county or municipal officer, who shall thereupon file within fifteen (15) days other security to be approved as provided by law. If said state, county or municipal officer shall not in the manner aforesaid file such bond to be approved as aforesaid, the said office shall become vacant and the said vacancy shall be filled in manner as is now provided by law. If a new bond shall be given by any officer, as hereinbefore provided, then the former surety or sureties shall be entirely released and discharged from all liability incurred by such officer after the time of the approval of said new bond, and the sureties to the new bond shall henceforth be liable as therein provided, after the approval of said new bond as aforesaid. The officer, officers, board or official body where or with whom said original bond was filed, shall have power to declare any office or offices vacant as hereinbefore provided; provided, that no surety shall be released from further responsibility until the office shall be declared vacant or a new bond approved by the proper authority.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 9, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2620; C.S. 1910, § 285; C.S. 1920, § 325; R.S. 1931, § 14-105; C.S. 1945, § 68-105; W.S. 1957, § 38-15.

Cross references. —

As to release of surety of school district treasurer, see §§

38-1-105

,

38-1-106

.

Time of liability. —

Where a new bond was required from county treasurer, the surety on the original bond, conditioned that the treasurer should pay and account for all moneys as required by law, was liable for funds lost before a new bond was given, though the treasurer’s duty to pay over the funds did not arise until after the new bond was given and his successor was installed. Roberts v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1899).

§ 38-2-107.
Bonds of fiduciaries; payment of premium includable as expense of trust.

Any receiver, assignee, guardian, trustee, committee, executor, administrator or curator or other fiduciary required by law or the order of any court or judge to give a bond or other obligation as such, may include as a part of the lawful expense of executing his trust, such reasonable sum paid a company authorized under the laws of this state so to do, for becoming his surety on such bond, as may be allowed by the court in which or a judge before whom he is required to account, on bonds of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more, not exceeding one-half of one percent per annum; on bonds of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), not to exceed the sum of five dollars ($5.00).

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 9, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2621; C.S. 1910, § 286; C.S. 1920, § 326; R.S. 1931, § 14-106; C.S. 1945, § 68-106; W.S. 1957, § 38-16.

Cross references. —

As to sureties of fiduciaries, see note at beginning of this title.

As to bonds of receivers, see §

1-33-103

.

Allowance of cost. —

The allowance to an administrator for the expense of a surety bond is proper, though the administrator’s appointment was revoked for irregularity, it having been valid until revoked, and the order of revocation having continued the bond in force. Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1905).

Management of decedent’s business. —

District court has power and jurisdiction in all matters of probate and jurisdiction to order that retail store owned by decedent be kept open during period of administration, and that his administratrix be allowed fee for extraordinary service in management thereof. In re Austin's Estate, 37 Wyo. 313, 261 P. 130,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1927).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for loss caused to estate by acts or default of agent or attorney employed by executor or administrator, 28 ALR3d 1191.

§ 38-2-108.
Bonds of fiduciaries; release of sureties.

The surety or the representative of any surety upon the bond of any trustee, committee, guardian, assignee, receiver, executor or administrator or other fiduciary, may apply by petition to the court wherein such bond is filed, or which may have jurisdiction of such trustee, committee, guardian, assignee, receiver, executor or administrator or other fiduciary, or to a judge of said court praying to be relieved from further liability as surety, for the acts or omissions of the trustees, committee, guardian, assignee, receiver, executor or administrator or other fiduciary which may occur after the date of the order relieving such surety, to be granted as herein provided for, and to require such trustee, committee, guardian, assignee, receiver, executor or other fiduciary to show cause why he should not account and such surety be relieved from such future liability, as aforesaid, and such principal be required to give a new bond, and thereupon, upon the filing of such petition, the court, or a judge thereof, shall issue such order, returnable at such time and place, and to be served in such manner, as such court or judge may direct, and may restrain such trustee, committee, guardian, assignee, receiver, executor or administrator or other fiduciary from acting, except in such manner as it may direct to preserve the trust estate; and upon the return of such order to show cause, if the principal in the bond account in due form of law and file a new bond duly approved, then such court or judge must make an order releasing such surety filing the petition, as aforesaid, from liability upon the bond for any subsequent act or default of the principal, and in default of such principal thus accounting and filing such new bond, such court or judge must make an order, directing such trustee, committee, guardian, assignee, receiver, executor or administrator or other fiduciary to account in due form of law, and that if the trust fund or estate shall be satisfactorily accounted for and delivered or properly secured, such surety shall be discharged from any and all further liability as such, for the subsequent acts or omissions of the trustee, committee, guardian, assignee, receiver, executor or administrator or other fiduciary, after the date of such surety being so relieved and discharged, and discharging such trustee, committee, guardian, assignee, receiver, executor or administrator.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 94, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 3252; C.S. 1910, § 4149; C.S. 1920, § 5299; R.S. 1931, § 113-105; C.S. 1945, § 68-205; W.S. 1957, § 38-17.

§ 38-2-109.
Recovery of premium as part of costs in actions and proceedings.

In all actions and proceedings wherein the parties thereto have furnished any bond, recognizance, undertaking, stipulation or other obligation, paying therefor to any company so authorized to do, a premium for such bond or obligation, such party, if entitled to recover costs in said action, shall be allowed and may tax and recover such sum paid such a company for executing any bond, recognizance, undertaking, stipulation or other obligation therein, not exceeding however, one-half of one percent on the amount of such bond, recognizance, undertaking, stipulation or other obligation on bonds of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more during each year the same has been in force; on bonds less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), not to exceed the sum of five dollars ($5.00).

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 9, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2623; C.S. 1910, § 288; C.S. 1920, § 328; R.S. 1931, § 14-108; C.S. 1945, § 68-108; W.S. 1957, § 38-18.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 5, ch. 9, Laws 1899, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.